Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1202, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1202. A. The Department of Transportation, the
Oklahoma Turnpike Authority and the Corporation Commission may enter
into interagency agreements concerning the equipment, maintenance
and operations of fixed facilities.
B. The Department of Transportation, the Authority and the
Commission shall endeavor to electronically upgrade weigh stations
Req. No. 12239 Page 1

as p ractical to minimize the duplication of inspections for
compliant commercial motor vehicles and motor carriers.
C. The Commission shall operate all current and future ports of
entry and weigh stations eighteen (18) to twenty (20) hours a day
and seven (7) days a week upon the availability of funds funding and
sufficient staff.
D. The Commission shall continue to conduct roadside
enforcement in the general area where a fixed facility is planned
but no fixed facility currently exists until a fixed facility is
located in the general area or July 1, 2016, whichever is earlier.
E. When a fixed facility is located in the general area,
Commission motor carrier and commercial motor vehicle enforcement
shall be limited to the fixed facility and a radius surrounding the
facility. If the fixed facility is a weigh station as defined in
Section 1201 of this title, the applicable radius shall be seven (7)
miles. If the fixed facility is a port of entry weigh station as
defined in Section 1201 of this title, the applicable radius shall
be twenty-five (25) miles.
F. The Commission may assist in perform roadside enforcement in
a joint effort at the request of the Oklahoma Highway Patrol, a
county sheriff, or a county commissioner who requests assistance
with roadside enforcement within his or her county.
G. E. The Commission is authorized to conduct audits, reviews,
investigations, inspections, roadside enforcement, or other
Req. No. 12239 Page 2

enfo rcement actions by enforcement officers, provided those
activities are within the scope of the Commission's jurisdiction and
are not conducted as roadside enforcement in accordance with the
provisions of the Oklahoma Weigh Station Act of 2012 that ports of
entry and weigh stations remain operational.
H. F. The Commission may enter into interagency cooperative
agreements with other state or federal agencies to jointly enforce
federal and state laws or rules.
I. G. North American Standard Inspections inspections shall be
conducted only by individuals holding certification in the level or
classification of inspection being conducted.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12239 JBH 01/21/25










Req. No. 12239 Page 3